Illinois, session 104th, HB4822.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Jury Commission Act is amended by changing 5Section 0.01 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 310/0.01)  (from Ch. 78, par. 23.9)7    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Jury Commission Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1324.)